District of Columbia statutes.
47-2324

Assessments for street paving — Deposit into General Fund.

All moneys derived from assessments for paving and repaving roadways under provisions of existing law shall be paid into the General Fund of the District of Columbia as established by § 47-131.

History

June 7, 1924, 43 Stat. 550, ch. 302
Jan. 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-42, § 3(b), 22 DCR 6311
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2324.
1973 Ed., § 47-1918.